Massachusetts, session 194th, H4270.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 87T of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Board”, and inserting in
place thereof the following definition:-
“Board”, the board of registration of cosmetology and barbering established by section 42
of chapter 13.
SECTION 2. Said chapter 112 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended
by inserting after section 87DD the following new section:-
Section 87DD 1/2. (a) The board shall, in consultation with the attorney general, make
available on their website a sample sign to persons owning a shop, school, or mobile business
engaged in cosmetology, which shall be displayed in such shop, school or mobile business in a
conspicuous manner that is clearly visible to patrons and employees.
of 2

The sign shall be not less than 8 ½ inches high and 11 inches wide and shall contain the
following notice:
“WARNING. Obtaining forced labor or services is a crime under Massachusetts law. If
you or someone you know is being forced to engage in any activity using threats, harm, or
restraint – whether it is commercial sex, housework, farm work or any other activity – call the
National Human Trafficking Hotline: 1-888-373-7888. You can remain anonymous, and the
Hotline is available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week.”
The notice text shall be provided on the sample sign in English, Spanish, Chinese,
Vietnamese, Portuguese and any other language as recommended by the board. Annually, the
board, in consultation with the attorney general, shall determine if the sample sign should be
made available in any other language.
of 2